District of Columbia statutes.
28-2301

Assignment of judgment or money decree.

A judgment or money decree may be assigned in writing, and upon the assignment thereof being filed in the clerk’s office the assignee may maintain an action or sue out an execution on the judgment in his own name, as the original plaintiff might have done.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 669, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-2301.
1973 Ed., § 28-2301.